Nebraska, session 109, LB204.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB204 LB204
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 19 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that:
(1) The use of biometric data is growing in commercial, therapeutic,
and recreational applications;
(2) The use of biometric data to identify or monitor individuals is
unlike other unique identifiers that are used in commercial and
recreational applications. Biometric data of an individual that has been
compromised leaves the individual with no recourse, a heightened risk for
identity theft, and a greater likelihood to withdraw from transactions
facilitated by biometric data;
(3) An overwhelming majority of members of the public are weary of
the use of biometric data when such data is tied to finances and other
personal information;
(4) The ramifications of biometric data technology are not fully
known; and
(5) The public's welfare, security, and safety will be served by
regulating the collection, use, safeguarding, handling, storage,
retention, and destruction of biometric data.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law:
(1)(a) Biometric data means data that is generated to identify a
specific individual through an automatic measurement of a biological
characteristic of such individual and includes any:
(i) Fingerprint;
(ii) Voice print;
(iii) Retina image;
(iv) Iris image; or
(v) Unique biological pattern or characteristic.
(b) Biometric data does not include:
(i) Any photograph, video recording, or audio recording, except for
data generated or collected from the biological characteristics of a
-2-

LB204 LB204
2025 2025
person depicted in any such photograph, video recording, or audio
recording; or
(ii) Information collected, used, or stored for health care
treatment, payment, or operations under the Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act;
(2) Collect means to gather, acquire, or obtain;
(3) Confidential and sensitive data means personal data that can be
used to uniquely identify an individual or an individual's account or
property, including any biometric data, genetic marker, genetic testing
data, unique identifier number used to locate any account or property,
account number, personal identification number, pass code, motor vehicle
operator's license number, state identification card number, or social
security number;
(4) Controller means any private entity or public entity that, alone
or jointly with others, determines the purpose and means of processing
biometric data;
(5) Disclose includes redisclosure and dissemination;
(6) Implantable device means a biocompatible device that can be
implanted inside the body;
(7) Portable means the ability of an individual to transfer
biometric data in a usable form from one controller or processor to
another controller or processor;
(8) Possess means to have any custody of, to have any control of, to
manage the storage of, or to use;
(9)(a) Private entity means any individual, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, association, or other group or
entity, however organized.
(b) Private entity does not include a public entity;
(10) Process or processing means an operation or set of operations
performed, whether by manual or automated means, on biometric data or on
sets of biometric data, such as the collection, use, storage, disclosure,
-3-

LB204 LB204
2025 2025
analysis, deletion, or modification of biometric data;
(11) Processor means any private entity or public entity that
processes biometric data on behalf of a controller;
(12) Public entity means:
(a) The State of Nebraska or any agent acting on behalf of the State
of Nebraska;
(b) Any state or local governmental agency or any agent acting on
behalf of any state or local governmental agency;
(c) Any political subdivision of the State of Nebraska or any agent
acting on behalf of any political subdivision of the State of Nebraska;
(d) Any court of Nebraska or any judge, justice, or agent acting on
behalf of such court; and
(e) The Legislative Council or any agent acting on behalf of the
Legislative Council;
(13) Secure means to make certain that biometric data is:
(a) Protected from the danger of loss;
(b) Protected from corruption of the data; and
(c) Safe from disclosure to any party not authorized to collect or
possess the data;
(14)(a) Security purpose means the prevention or investigation of
any safety concern or criminal activity; and
(b) Security purpose includes:
(i) Assisting a law enforcement investigation, protecting property
from trespass, controlling access to property, or protecting any person
from harm, including stalking, violence, or harassment; and
(ii) Enforcement through any photograph, video recording, drug test,
or identification method; and
(15) Written consent means a document that indicates informed
written consent that:
(a) Is provided in a physical or an electronic format by an
individual who is nineteen years of age or older or by such individual’s
-4-

LB204 LB204
2025 2025
legal guardian or legally authorized representative;
(b) Only uses language that is clear, concise, and written at the
seventh-grade lexile as such lexile is defined by the State Department of
Education; and
(c)(i) For a physical document, is physically signed by the person
who is providing the written consent; or
(ii) For a digital document, contains an affirmative indication of
consent made by the person who is providing the written consent.
Sec. 4. Biometric data is the property of the individual from whom
the data was originally collected. An individual may sell the right to
use his or her biometric data or otherwise consent to its use.
Sec. 5. Any private entity or public entity shall not require or
coerce any individual to be subject to any implantable device.
Sec. 6. Except as provided in section 18 of this act, a private
entity shall not require or coerce any individual to wear or be subject
to a device of any kind that collects biometric data.
Sec. 7. Except as provided in section 18 of this act, a private
entity shall not require any individual to provide or submit to the
collection of biometric data.
Sec. 8. (1) Except as provided in section 18 of this act, any
controller or processor that is a private entity shall only collect or
possess biometric data in a manner that is secure and portable.
(2) Except as provided in section 18 of this act, an individual may
provide a written request to a controller or processor in possession of
such individual's biometric data to transfer such biometric data to
another controller or processor. A controller or processor shall transfer
such biometric data as requested within thirty calendar days after
receiving such written request.
Sec. 9. (1) Except as provided in section 18 of this act, any
controller or processor that is a private entity that is or intends to be
in possession of any individual's biometric data shall develop and make
-5-

LB204 LB204
2025 2025
available to the public a written policy establishing a retention
schedule and guidelines for permanently destroying biometric data at the
earliest occurrence of the following:
(a) Unless the individual has provided written consent to a longer
term, the initial purpose for collecting or possessing such data has been
satisfied;
(b) Unless the individual has provided written consent to a longer
term, within one year after the last interaction between the private
entity and the individual from whom the data was originally collected; or
(c) The expiration or withdrawal of the written consent from the
individual from whom the data was originally collected.
(2) Except if necessary to comply with a warrant or subpoena issued
by a court of competent jurisdiction, a controller or processor that is a
private entity in possession of biometric data shall comply with the
established retention schedule and destruction guidelines of such
controller or processor.
Sec. 10. (1) Except as provided in section 18 of this act, a
private entity shall not collect or possess an individual's biometric
data unless the individual from whom the data was originally collected,
or such individual's legal guardian or legally authorized representative,
has provided written consent that (a) authorizes such collection or
possession and (b) specifies the purpose and duration for such collection
or possession.
(2) Each document used to provide written consent shall include a
biometric data collection warning. Such warning shall clearly and
conspicuously indicate the biometric data that will be collected or
possessed, the purpose and duration for such collection or possession,
and a statement that is substantially similar to the following:
(a) "Do you consent to [private entity] collecting your biometric
data for [each specified purpose]?";
(b) "Do you consent to [private entity] possessing your biometric
-6-

LB204 LB204
2025 2025
data for [each specified purpose]?"; and
(c) "Do you consent to [private entity] selling or sharing your
biometric data with [any third party]?".
Sec. 11. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section
and section 18 of this act, a private entity or public entity shall not
provide a difference in any service, good, benefit, or reward provided to
any individual who does not consent to the collection or possession of
biometric data.
(2) A private entity or public entity may provide a difference in
any service, good, benefit, or reward provided to any individual who does
not consent to the collection or possession of biometric data if such
collection or possession is necessary to the provision of the service,
good, benefit, or reward such that its absence would render the service,
good, benefit, or reward inoperable, meaningless, or irrelevant.
Sec. 12. (1) A private entity or public entity in possession of or
with access to biometric data shall not sell, lease, trade, or use
biometric data without the prior written consent of the individual from
whom the data was originally collected.
(2) This section does not apply to the use of biometric data by any
law enforcement agency or any agent acting on behalf of any law
enforcement agency if such use is for a legitimate purpose of the law
enforcement agency.
Sec. 13. A processor that is in possession of biometric data shall
not disclose an individual's biometric data unless such disclosure is
compliant with the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law and:
(1) Such individual or such individual's legal guardian or legally
authorized representative provides written consent to the disclosure;
(2) The disclosure is required or authorized by law;
(3) The disclosure is required pursuant to a warrant or subpoena
issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(4) The disclosure is made pursuant to a criminal action or
-7-

LB204 LB204
2025 2025
proceeding;
(5) The disclosure is made pursuant to a civil action or proceeding
under section 15 of this act; or
(6) Such processor is cooperating with any law enforcement agency
and reasonably and in good faith believes the biometric data that will be
disclosed concerns any of the following:
(a) Conduct or activity that violates any federal, state, or local
law, rule, or regulation;
(b) Any missing person; or
(c) Public health.
Sec. 14. A processor that is in possession of biometric data shall
store, transmit, and protect from disclosure all of such data:
(1) Using the reasonable standard of care within the industry or
profession of the processor; and
(2) In a manner that:
(a) Is the same as or more protective than the manner in which the
processor stores, transmits, and protects other confidential and
sensitive data; or
(b) Converts the biometric data to a mathematical representation,
including a numeric string or a similar method that cannot be used to
recreate the biometric data.
Sec. 15. (1) The Attorney General may:
(a) Issue subpoenas and file a civil action to recover direct
economic damages for any affected Nebraska resident aggrieved by a
violation of the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law; and
(b) Seek injunctive relief for a violation of the Biometric Autonomy
Liberty Law.
(2) A violation of the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law shall be
considered a violation of section 59-1602 and be subject to the Consumer
Protection Act and any other law that provides for the implementation and
enforcement of section 59-1602.
-8-

LB204 LB204
2025 2025
(3) Before bringing an action under this section, the Attorney
General or an individual shall provide written notice to the party
alleged to have violated the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law. Such party
shall have sixty days from the date of receiving such notice to cure the
alleged violation. If the alleged violation is cured within the sixty-day
period, no action shall be maintained against such party for the alleged
violation.
(4) For purposes of a civil action under this section, the following
conduct by a private entity shall constitute only a single violation of
the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law, notwithstanding that there were
multiple instances of such conduct:
(a) Collecting, capturing, purchasing, receiving through trade, or
otherwise obtaining the same biometric data from the same person using
the same method of collection; and
(b) Disclosing the same type of biometric data obtained from the
same person to the same recipient using the same method of collection.
Sec. 16. A waiver of any provision of the Biometric Autonomy
Liberty Law obtained without the written consent of the individual
waiving such provision or such individual's legal guardian or legally
authorized representative is contrary to public policy and is void and
unenforceable.
Sec. 17. Nothing in the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law shall be
construed to:
(1) Impact the admission or discovery of biometric data in any legal
action of any kind in any court or before any private entity or public
entity;
(2) Conflict with:
(a) The Data Privacy Act;
(b) The Genetic Information Privacy Act;
(c) Sections 71-8401 to 71-8407; or
(d) The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
-9-

LB204 LB204
2025 2025
of 1996 and the rules promulgated under such act;
(3) Apply to emergency medical care that is covered by the Emergency
Medical Services Practice Act;
(4) Apply to facial recognition technology used by the Department of
Motor Vehicles for fraud detection;
(5) Apply to personal data regulated by the federal Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as such act
existed on January 1, 2025; or
(6) Apply to a financial institution, an affiliate of a financial
institution, or data subject to Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15
U.S.C. 6801 et seq., as such title existed on January 1, 2025.
Sec. 18. Sections 6 to 11 of this act shall not apply to biometric
data collected or possessed for a security purpose.
Sec. 19. The Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law shall not apply to any
information collected, used, or stored for health care treatment,
payment, or operations, including protected health information, under the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and
the rules promulgated under such act.
Sec. 20. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
-10-